Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-103.6q of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Prior to the beginning of the 2027-2028 school year, the
State Department of Education shall develop and make available to
public high schools in this state a curriculum for students in ninth

Req. No. 15737 Page 1

thro ugh twelfth grades to address awareness and prevention of
domestic violence and human trafficking. The curriculum shall:
1. Teach students how to recognize, prevent, and seek help for
domestic violence and human trafficking;
2. Teach students the warning signs of dating violence and
abusive behavior including both physical and emotional abuse;
3. Promote safe and healthy relationships and student well-
being including healthy relationship communication skills; and
4. Be medically accurate and appropriate for the age of the
students.
B. The curriculum required by subsection A of this section may
be taught as a stand-alone unit of instruction or may be integrated
into one or more existing courses of study.
C. The State Department of Education shall post the curriculum
on its website and shall identify resources that school districts
can use to implement the provisions of this section.
D. School districts in this state may begin teaching the
concepts provided for in subsection A of this section during the
2027-2028 school year.
E. A school district that teaches the concepts provided for in
subsection A of this section shall provide an option for the parent
or legal guardian of a student to opt the student out of the
curriculum provided for in this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
Req. No. 15737 Page 2

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-15737 SW 12/10/25


















Req. No. 15737 Page 3